Connecticut, session 2026, HB05394.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 8-270 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) In addition to amounts otherwise authorized by this chapter, a
state agency shall make a payment to or for any displaced person who
is displaced from any dwelling and not eligible to receive a payment
under section 8-269, [which] provided such dwelling was actually and
lawfully occupied by such displaced person for not less than ninety days
prior to the initiation of negotiations for the acquisition of such dwelling
under the program or project which results in such person being
displaced. [Such]
(b) Any payment made pursuant to this section shall be [either (1)
the] in an amount necessary to enable such displaced person to (1) lease
or rent, for a period not to exceed four years, a decent, safe [,] and
sanitary dwelling of standards adequate to accommodate such person,
or accommodations in a hotel, as defined in section 12-407, in [areas] an
area not generally less desirable with regard to public utilities and
public and commercial facilities, and reasonably accessible to such
displaced person's place of employment, [but not to] provided no such
LCO 1 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5394
payment shall exceed four thousand dollars, or (2) [the amount
necessary to enable such displaced person to] make a down payment,
including reasonable expenses incurred by such displaced person for
evidence of title, recording fees [,] and other closing costs incident to the
purchase of a decent, safe [,] and sanitary dwelling of standards
adequate to accommodate such person in [areas] an area not generally
less desirable with regard to public utilities and public and commercial
facilities, [but not to] provided no such payment shall exceed four
thousand dollars. [, except that if such amount exceeds two thousand
dollars, such] Any person [must equally] who receives a payment
pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection in excess of two thousand
dollars shall match any such amount in excess of two thousand dollars
in making [the downpayment, and provided, whenever] such down
payment.
(c) Whenever any tenant [in any] of a dwelling unit is displaced as
the result of the enforcement of any code to which this section is
applicable by any town, city or borough or agency thereof, the landlord
of such dwelling unit shall be liable for any payments made by such
town, city or borough pursuant to subsection (b) of this section or by the
state pursuant to subsection (b) of section 8-280, as amended by this act,
and the town, city or borough or the state may place a lien on any real
property owned by such landlord to secure repayment to the town, city
or borough or the state of such payments, which lien shall have the same
priority as and shall be filed, enforced and discharged in the same
manner as a lien for municipal taxes under chapter 205.
[(b)] (d) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, in the case of
displacement of a person on or after October 1, 2007, because of
acquisition of real property by a redevelopment agency pursuant to
section 8-128, a development agency pursuant to section 8-193, or an
implementing agency pursuant to section 32-224, pursuant to a
redevelopment plan approved under chapter 130 or a development plan
approved under chapter 132 or 588l, the agency shall make relocation
payments as provided under the federal Uniform Relocation Assistance
and Real Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970, 42 USC 4601 et seq.
LCO 2 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5394
and any subsequent amendments thereto and regulations promulgated
thereunder if payments under said act and regulations would be greater
than payments under this section and sections 8-268 and 8-269.
Sec. 2. Section 8-280 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) The state, acting by and in the discretion of the Commissioner of
Housing, may enter into a contract or agreement with a state agency to
provide state financial assistance to [such] the state agency in the form
of a grant-in-aid equal to two-thirds of the net cost of [carrying out] a
program [of] to provide relocation assistance pursuant to a relocation
plan [as provided under] prepared pursuant to section 8-281 and
approved by the commissioner. [Such] Any such grant-in-aid shall: (1)
Provide actual administration costs not to exceed one hundred dollars
for each dwelling unit and two hundred fifty dollars for each farm or
business, relocated in accordance with the provisions of this chapter; (2)
provide advance grants for relocation assistance paid pursuant to the
provisions of said section to persons, families, businesses and farm
operations and nonprofit organizations not otherwise entitled to
relocation assistance from any program of any other state agency or any
program of the federal government and who have not been reimbursed
for moving costs in a condemnation proceeding; and (3) include the cost
of the preparation of the relocation plan.
(b) The Commissioner of Housing shall not provide a grant-in-aid
pursuant to subsection (a) of this section to any town, city or borough
for the cost of [carrying out] a program [of] to provide relocation
assistance for persons displaced as the direct result of code enforcement
activities undertaken by a town, city or borough, unless such town, city
or borough agrees to (1) [places, pursuant to section 8-270,] place a lien
on all real property in such town, city or borough, [which] pursuant to
section 8-270, as amended by this act, that is owned by the landlord of
the persons who are displaced by such code enforcement activities, and
(2) [assigns] assign to the state [the claim of] any claim that the town,
city or borough may have against such landlord for the costs of [carrying
LCO 3 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5394
out such program of] such relocation assistance not later than one year
after the final payment to any person under such program. The Attorney
General shall [be responsible for collecting] collect any such claim [and
may carry out such responsibility] by (A) enforcing any such lien
assigned to the state by the town, city or borough, (B) placing and
enforcing a lien on any other real property owned by the landlord in the
state, or (C) instituting civil proceedings in the Superior Court against
such landlord. Two-thirds of all funds collected by the Attorney General
from a landlord pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited in the
General Fund and the remaining one-third of such funds shall be
remitted to the town, city or borough [which] that brought code
enforcement activities against such landlord.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 8-270
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 8-280
PD Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 4 of 4